Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-194
Risk Manager; authority; Attorney General; duties.

The Risk Manager, on behalf of the State Claims Board and with the advice of the Attorney General, shall have the authority to pay claims of all workers' compensation benefits when liability is undisputed. In any claims when liability or the amount of liability is disputed by the Attorney General, authority is hereby conferred upon the Attorney General to consider, ascertain, adjust, determine, and allow any workers' compensation claim. If any such claim is compromised or settled, the approval of the claimant, the State Claims Board, and the Attorney General shall be required and such settlements also shall be approved by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court following the procedure in the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 3;

Laws 1972, LB 1334, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 10;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 123;

Laws 1993, LB 757, § 29.